Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section
180.62, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 394, O.S.L. 2024 (19
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 180.62), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 180.62 A. The basic salaries of county officers
upon which all salaries and future increases or decreases
thereof shall not be less than Nineteen Thousand Dollars
($19,000.00) per annum nor shall they exceed Forty-nine
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($49,500.00) per annum,
provided the basic salary for the sheriff and county
HB3891 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

comm issioners, which shall be no less than other salaries for
county officers controlled by this section, shall not be less
than Forty-four Thousand Dollars ($44,000.00) per annum nor
shall it exceed Seventy-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($74,500.00) per annum.
B. The board of county commissioners, or if the county has
elected to come under the County Budget Act, the budget board
members of the county, shall set the salaries for all elected county
officials within the limits allowed by law.
C. The annual salaries fixed by this act shall be paid either
monthly or twice a month, by order of the board of county
commissioners, for each month or fraction thereof the incumbent
lawfully occupies and holds title to such office.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 03/09/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended.








HB3891 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.